Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.08.087

Authorized but unissued shares of capital stock—Issuance—Consideration.

Any bank may provide in its articles of incorporation or amendments thereto for authorized but unissued shares of its capital stock. The shares may be issued for such consideration as shall be established by the board from time to time and all consideration received therefor shall be allocated to the capital stock or surplus of the corporation.

[ 2014 c 37 s 162; 1994 c 256 s 45; 1986 c 279 s 26; 1979 c 106 s 1; 1965 c 140 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.08.087.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.